Utah statutes.
23-15-4.   Screens or other devices required -- Failure to install after
notice a misdemeanor.
It is unlawful for any person, company or corporation to take any water from
the state streams, lakes or reservoirs for power purposes, or for waterworks,
without first furnishing and maintaining suitable screens or other devices to
prevent fish from entering such power plants, millraces or waterworks system;
said screen or other devices to be built and maintained under the direction of
the board and at the expense of said owner or operators. The failure of any
person, firm or corporation to install a screen or device within 30 days after
notice in writing so to do has been given by the board shall constitute a
misdemeanor.
